Utah statutes.
15-4-6.5.   Divorce or separate maintenance of co-obligors.

(1)  On the entering of a decree of divorce or separate maintenance of joint debtors in contract, the claim of a creditor remains unchanged unless otherwise provided by the contract or until a new contract is entered into between the creditor and the debtors individually.

(2)  In addition to the creditor's duties as a secured party under Title 70A, Chapter 9a, Uniform Commercial Code -- Secured Transactions, and the creditor's duties as a trustee or beneficiary of a trust deed under Title 57, Chapter 1, Conveyances, a creditor, who has been notified by service of a copy of a court order under Section 30-3-5 or 30-4-3 that the debtors are divorced or living separately under an order for separate maintenance, and who has been expressly advised of the separate, current addresses of the debtors either by the court order or by other written notice, shall provide to the debtors individually all statements, notices, and other similar correspondence required by law or by the contract.

(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), a creditor may continue to make negative credit reports of joint debtors under Section 70C-7-107 and may report the repayment practices or credit history of joint debtors under Title 7, Chapter 14, Credit Information Exchange.

(b)  With respect to a debtor who is not ordered by the court under Sections 30-3-5 or 30-4-3 to make payments on a joint obligation, no negative credit report under Section 70C-7-107, and no report of the debtor's repayment practices or credit history under Title 7, Chapter 14, Credit Information Exchange, may be made regarding the joint obligation after the creditor is served notice of the court's order as required under Subsection (2), unless the creditor has made a demand on the debtor for payment because of the failure to make payments by the other debtor, who is ordered by the court to make the payments.



Amended by Chapter 252, 2000 General Session

